Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 5. Administration of Grants.

Administrative Code. —

For grant administration, see 2 AAC 45.

Sec. 37.05.315.
Grants to municipalities.

When an amount is appropriated or allocated as a grant to a municipality, the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall promptly notify the municipality of the availability of the grant. When the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development receives an agreement executed by the municipality that provides that the municipality (1) will spend the grant for the purposes specified in the appropriation or allocation; (2) will allow, on request, an audit by the state of the uses made of the grant; and (3) assures that, to the extent consistent with the purpose of the appropriation or allocation, the facilities and services provided with the grant will be available for the use of the general public, the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall pay the grant directly to the municipality. The agreement executed by a municipality under this section shall be on a form furnished by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development and shall be executed within 60 days after the effective date of the appropriation or allocation.

An appropriation or allocation for a grant to a municipality lapses if substantial, ongoing work on the project has not begun within five years after the effective date of the appropriation or allocation.

In accepting a grant of money for construction of a public facility, a municipality covenants with the state that it will operate and maintain the facility for the practical life of the facility and that the municipality will not look to the state to operate or maintain the facility or pay for its operation or maintenance. This requirement does not apply to a grant of money for repair or improvement of an existing facility operated or maintained by the state at the time the grant is accepted if the repair or improvement for which the grant is made will not substantially increase the operating or maintenance costs to the state.

Not less than 20 percent of a grant shall be paid to a municipality within 10 days of the effective date of the agreement under (a) of this section. The remainder of the grant shall be paid either in monthly installments equal to the amount of grant money the municipality expended in the previous month or in a lump sum as determined by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall require a municipality awarded a grant for a public works project under (a) of this section to comply with the hiring preferences under AS

36.10.150

—

36.10.175

for employment generated by the grant.

History.

(§ 1 ch 156 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 1982; am § 7 ch 33 SLA 1986; am §§ 36, 37 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 5 ch 61 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (e) of this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in subsections (a) and (d) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” five times, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 37.05.316.
Grants to named recipients.

When an amount is appropriated or allocated to a department as a grant under this section for a named recipient that is not a municipality, the department to which the appropriation or allocation is made shall promptly notify the named recipient of the availability of the grant and request the named recipient to submit a proposal to provide the goods or services specified in the appropriation act for which the appropriation or allocation is made. A grant agreement must be executed within 60 days after the effective date of the appropriation or allocation unless the department determines that an award of the grant would not be in the public interest.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall require a recipient awarded a grant for a public works project under (a) of this section to comply with the hiring preferences under AS

36.10.150

—

36.10.175

for employment generated by the grant.

An appropriation or allocation for a grant to a named recipient that is not a municipality lapses if substantial, ongoing work on the project has not begun within five years after the effective date of the appropriation or allocation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 4 SLA 1982; am § 8 ch 33 SLA 1986; am § 39 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 5 ch 59 SLA 1997; am § 6 ch 61 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Under this section, it is the duty of each department, through which a named-recipient grant is administered, to determine if the public purpose requirement of Alaska Const., art. IX, § 6 is met.
A payment for retirement of a preexisting debt to which the state is not a party confers no benefit on the public; and failure to confer a public benefit violates the public purpose doctrine. 2003 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 3.

Sec. 37.05.317.
Grants to unincorporated communities.

When an amount is appropriated or allocated as a grant under this section to an unincorporated community, it shall be disbursed as follows:

Within 45 days after the effective date of the appropriation or allocation, the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall notify the governing body of the unincorporated community, if any, that a grant is available.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall determine if there is a qualified incorporated entity in the community area that will agree to receive the grant and administer it, subject to terms generally applicable to private grantees. If there is more than one such entity, the Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development shall select the most qualified and the grant shall be awarded to that incorporated entity for the purposes specified in the appropriation act. However, the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall give preference to a nonprofit corporation organized by a community for receipt of the grant.

If there is no incorporated entity qualified to receive the grant, the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall administer the program as specified in the appropriation act directly or through agents or contractors with whom it may contract in the community area.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall require the qualified incorporated entity awarded a grant or agents or contractors with whom the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development contracts under (a) of this section to comply with the requirements of AS

36.10.150

—

36.10.175

for employment generated by the grant or contract if the grant or contract is for a public works project.

An appropriation or allocation for a grant to an unincorporated community lapses if substantial, ongoing work on the project has not begun within five years after the effective date of the appropriation or allocation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 4 SLA 1982; am § 9 ch 33 SLA 1986; am § 7 ch 61 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to read “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999, and in (a) and (b) of this section, “Community and Regional Affairs” was changed to “Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 91(a)(9), ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (a) and (b) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” six times, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 37.05.318.
Further regulations prohibited.

Notwithstanding AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act), and other provisions of this chapter, a state agency may not adopt regulations or impose additional requirements or procedures to implement, interpret, make specific, or otherwise carry out the provisions of AS

37.05.315

—

37.05.317

unless required by the federal government for participation in federal programs.

History.

(§ 2 ch 4 SLA 1982; am § 22 ch 99 SLA 2004)

Sec. 37.05.319.
[Renumbered as AS 37.05.325.]

Sec. 37.05.320.
[Renumbered as AS 37.05.990.]

Sec. 37.05.321.
Restriction on use.

A grant or earnings from a grant made under AS

37.05.315

—

37.05.317

may not be used for the purpose of influencing legislative action.
In this section “influencing legislative action” means promoting, advocating, supporting, modifying, opposing, or delaying or seeking to do the same with respect to any legislative action but does not include the provision or use of information, statistics, studies, or analyses in written or oral form or format.
A grant or earnings from a grant made under AS

37.05.315

—

37.05.317

may not be used for purposes of travel in connection with influencing legislative action unless pursuant to a specific request from a legislator or legislative committee.

History.

(§ 2 ch 159 SLA 1984)

Sec. 37.05.325.
Definitions for AS 37.05.315 — 37.05.317.

In AS

37.05.315

—

37.05.317

, “allocation” and “appropriation” have the meanings given in AS

37.07.120

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 4 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

37.05.319

. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 37.05.330.
[Renumbered as AS 37.05.410.]

Sec. 37.05.400.
[Renumbered as AS 37.05.990.]

Sec. 37.05.410.
[Renumbered as AS 37.05.995.]